Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 2.2 Rhode Island Utility Fair Share Roadway Repair Act

39-2.2-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Utility Fair Share Roadway Repair Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 234, § 1.

39-2.2-2.
Road repair by public utility or utility facility.

Any public utility as defined by §

39-1-2

or any utility facility as defined by chapter 8.1 of title 24 that shall alter, excavate, disrupt, or disturb a roadway shall be responsible for complete repaving and repair of the roadway from curbline to curbline or as required in accordance with the state or municipal utility permit requirements.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 234, § 1.

39-2.2-3.
State road repair.

Any repaving and repair of a state road required by §

39-2.2-2

shall be to the satisfaction of the director of the department of transportation.

All utility work within and/or upon a state road or state right-of-way requires a state utility permit issued by the department of transportation prior to the work commencing. Any public utility or utility facility violating this section for non-emergency utility work without a state utility permit shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500) per incident in addition to the required road repaving and repair (restoration).

As part of the state utility permit requirements:

The public utility or utility facility shall obtain and submit to the state a performance bond in accordance with the state utility permit application requirements prior to the state utility permit being issued by the department of transportation; and

The department of transportation will contract with pre-qualified vendors (Master Price Agreement) to conduct state-certified testing and inspection services on all utility work in accordance with the state utility permit requirements, and the public utility or utility facility shall reimburse the department of transportation for these costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 234, § 1.

39-2.2-4.
Municipal road repair.

Any repaving and repair of a municipal road required by §

39-2.2-2

shall be in accordance with standards promulgated by the director of the department of transportation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 234, § 1.

39-2.2-5.
Recovery for failure to repair state road.

If the director of the department of transportation deems any repaving or repair of a state road insufficient, defective, noncompliant, or incomplete and requests repairs, it will be the responsibility of the public utility or utility facility to complete the repairs to the satisfaction of the director of the department of transportation within thirty (30) days of being notified.

If the public utility or utility facility fails to complete the repairs, the department of transportation will initiate the repairs through the performance bond claim process and/or recovering the amount required for the repairs from the public utility or utility facility.

If any payment determined to be due from any public utility or utility facility for reparation, reconstruction, or repaving shall not be paid to the state within one year from the date of the determination, the state shall be entitled to recover the amount due in an action of debt, together with interest from six (6) months from the date of determination at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 234, § 1.